Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10 UNIFORM DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE ACT
14-10-129. Modification of parenting time.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section, the court may make or modify an order granting or denying parenting time rights whenever such order or modification would serve the best interests of the child. The trial court retains continuing jurisdiction to make or modify an order granting or denying parenting time rights pursuant to this section during the pendency of an appeal.
(1) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section, the court may make or modify an order granting or denying parenting time rights whenever such order or modification would serve the best interests of the child. The trial court retains continuing jurisdiction to make or modify an order granting or denying parenting time rights pursuant to this section during the pendency of an appeal.

In those cases in which a party with whom the child resides a majority of the time is seeking to relocate with the child to a residence that substantially changes the geographical ties between the child and the other party, the court, in determining whether the modification of parenting time is in the best interests of the child, shall take into account all relevant factors, including those enumerated in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section. The party who is intending to relocate with the child to a residence that substantially changes the geographical ties between the child and the other party shall provide the other party with written notice as soon as practicable of his or her intent to relocate, the location where the party intends to reside, the reason for the relocation, and a proposed revised parenting time plan. A court hearing on any modification of parenting time due to an intent to relocate shall be given a priority on the court's docket.

The court shall not restrict a parent's parenting time rights unless it finds that the parenting time would endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's emotional development. In addition to a finding that parenting time would endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's emotional development, in any order imposing or continuing a parenting time restriction, the court shall enumerate the specific factual findings supporting the restriction. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect grandparent or great-grandparent visitation granted pursuant to section 19-1-117, C.R.S.

The provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall not apply in those cases in which a party with whom the child resides a majority of the time is intending to relocate with the child to a residence that substantially changes the geographical ties between the child and the other party.

(1.5) If a motion for a substantial modification of parenting time which also changes the party with whom the child resides a majority of the time has been filed, whether or not it has been granted, no subsequent motion may be filed within two years after disposition of the prior motion unless the court decides, on the basis of affidavits, that the child's present environment may endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's emotional development or that the party with whom the child resides a majority of the time is intending to relocate with the child to a residence that substantially changes the geographical ties between the child and the other party.

The court shall not modify a prior order concerning parenting time that substantially changes the parenting time as well as changes the party with whom the child resides a majority of the time unless it finds, upon the basis of facts that have arisen since the prior decree or that were unknown to the court at the time of the prior decree, that a change has occurred in the circumstances of the child or the party with whom the child resides the majority of the time and that the modification is necessary to serve the best interests of the child. In applying these standards, the court shall retain the parenting time schedule established in the prior decree unless:

The parties agree to the modification; or

The child has been integrated into the family of the moving party with the consent of the other party; or

The party with whom the child resides a majority of the time is intending to relocate with the child to a residence that substantially changes the geographical ties between the child and the other party. A court hearing on any modification of parenting time due to an intent to relocate shall be given a priority on the court's docket. In determining whether the modification of parenting time is in the best interests of the child, the court shall take into account all relevant factors, including whether a party has committed an act of domestic violence, has engaged in a pattern of domestic violence, or has a history of domestic violence, as that term is defined in section 14-10-124 (1.3), which factor shall be supported by a preponderance of the evidence, and shall consider such domestic violence whether it occurred before or after the prior decree, and all other factors enumerated in section 14-10-124 (1.5)(a) and:

The reasons why the party wishes to relocate with the child;

The reasons why the opposing party is objecting to the proposed relocation;

The history and quality of each party's relationship with the child since any previous parenting time order;

The educational opportunities for the child at the existing location and at the proposed new location;

The presence or absence of extended family at the existing location and at the proposed new location;

Any advantages of the child remaining with the primary caregiver;

The anticipated impact of the move on the child;

Whether the court will be able to fashion a reasonable parenting time schedule if the change requested is permitted; and

Any other relevant factors bearing on the best interests of the child; or

The child's present environment endangers the child's physical health or significantly impairs the child's emotional development and the harm likely to be caused by a change of environment is outweighed by the advantage of a change to the child.

(2.5) (a) When the court restricts a party's parenting time pursuant to section 19-5-105.5, C.R.S., or section 19-5-105.7, C.R.S., or section 14-10-124 (4)(a)(IV), the court may make or modify an order granting or denying parenting time rights whenever such order or modification would serve the best interests of the child. Within thirty-five days after the filing of a verified motion by the restricted party seeking a modification of parenting time, the court shall determine from the verified motion, and response to the motion, if any, whether there has been a substantial and continuing change of circumstances such that the current parenting time orders are no longer in the child's best interests, including consideration of whether the restricted parent has satisfactorily complied with any conditions set forth by the court when the court imposed the restrictions on parenting time, and either:

Deny the motion, if there is an inadequate allegation; or

Set the matter for hearing as expeditiously as possible with notice to the parties of the time and place of the hearing.

If the court finds that the filing of a motion under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) was substantially frivolous, substantially groundless, substantially vexatious, or intended to harass or intimidate the other party, the court shall require the moving party to pay the reasonable and necessary attorney fees and costs of the other party.

If a parent has been convicted of any of the crimes listed in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) or convicted in another state or jurisdiction, including but not limited to a military or federal jurisdiction, of an offense that, if committed in Colorado, would constitute any of the crimes listed in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), or convicted of any crime in which the underlying factual basis has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1), C.R.S., that constitutes a potential threat or endangerment to the child, the other parent, or any other person who has been granted custody of or parental responsibility for the child pursuant to court order may file an objection to parenting time with the court. The other parent or other person having custody or parental responsibility shall give notice to the offending parent of such objection as provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure, and the offending parent shall have twenty-one days from such notice to respond. If the offending parent fails to respond within twenty-one days, the parenting time rights of such parent shall be suspended until further order of the court. If such parent responds and objects, a hearing shall be held within thirty-five days of such response. The court may determine that any offending parent who responds and objects shall be responsible for the costs associated with any hearing, including reasonable attorney fees incurred by the other parent. In making such determination, the court shall consider the criminal record of the offending parent and any actions to harass the other parent and the children, any mitigating actions by the offending parent, and whether the actions of either parent have been substantially frivolous, substantially groundless, or substantially vexatious. The offending parent shall have the burden at the hearing to prove that parenting time by such parent is in the best interests of the child or children.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall apply to the following crimes:

Murder in the first degree, as defined in section 18-3-102, C.R.S.;

Murder in the second degree, as defined in section 18-3-103, C.R.S.;

Enticement of a child, as defined in section 18-3-305, C.R.S.;

Sexual assault, as described in section 18-3-402, C.R.S.; and

Sexual assault in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-402, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 2000;

Sexual assault in the second degree, as described in section 18-3-403, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 2000;

Unlawful sexual contact if the victim is compelled to submit, as described in section 18-3-404 (2), C.R.S.; and

Sexual assault in the third degree if the victim is compelled to submit, as described in section 18-3-404 (2), C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 2000;

Sexual assault on a child, as defined in section 18-3-405, C.R.S.;

Incest, as described in section 18-6-301, C.R.S.;

Aggravated incest, as described in section 18-6-302, C.R.S.;

Child abuse, as described in section 18-6-401 (7)(a)(I) to (7)(a)(IV), C.R.S.;

Human trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude, as described in section 18-3-504 (2), C.R.S.;

Sexual exploitation of children, as defined in section 18-6-403, C.R.S.;

Procurement of a child for sexual exploitation, as defined in section 18-6-404, C.R.S.;

Soliciting for child prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-402, C.R.S.;

Pandering of a child, as defined in section 18-7-403, C.R.S.;

Procurement of a child, as defined in section 18-7-403.5, C.R.S.;

Keeping a place of child prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-404, C.R.S.;

Pimping of a child, as defined in section 18-7-405, C.R.S.;

Inducement of child prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-405.5, C.R.S.;

Patronizing a prostituted child, as defined in section 18-7-406, C.R.S.

If the party was convicted in another state or jurisdiction of an offense that, if committed in Colorado, would constitute an offense listed in subparagraphs (III) to (XX) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the court shall order that party to submit to a sex-offense-specific evaluation and a parental risk assessment in Colorado and the court shall consider the recommendations of the evaluation and the assessment in any order the court makes relating to parenting time or parental contact. The convicted party shall pay for the costs of the evaluation and the assessment.

A motion to restrict parenting time or parental contact with a parent which alleges that the child is in imminent physical or emotional danger due to the parenting time or contact by the parent shall be heard and ruled upon by the court not later than fourteen days after the day of the filing of the motion. Any parenting time which occurs during such fourteen-day period after the filing of such a motion shall be supervised by an unrelated third party deemed suitable by the court or by a licensed mental health professional, as defined in section 14-10-127 (1)(b). This subsection (4) shall not apply to any motion which is filed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

If the court finds that the filing of a motion under subsection (4) of this section was substantially frivolous, substantially groundless, or substantially vexatious, the court shall require the moving party to pay the reasonable and necessary attorney fees and costs of the other party.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 531, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-29.

L. 73:

p. 554, § 11.

L. 88:

(3) added, p. 643, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 89:

(4) and (5) added, p. 803, § 2, effective April 27.

L. 90:

(3)(a) amended, p. 902, § 1, effective March 16.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 261, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 93:

(1), (2), (3)(a), and (4) amended, p. 578, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1), (2), and (3)(a) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1387, § 15, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2000:

(3)(b)(IV), (3)(b)(V), and (3)(b)(VI) amended, p. 701, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1), (1.5), and (2) amended, p. 761, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended and (3)(c) added, p. 1636, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2010:

(3)(b)(XI) amended, (SB 10-140), ch. 156, p. 537, § 3, effective April 21; IP(2)(c) amended, (HB 10-1135), ch. 87, p. 291, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 833, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

IP(2)(c) and (4) amended, (HB 13-1259), ch. 218, p. 1000, § 4, effective July 1; (1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 13-1243), ch. 124, p. 418, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 14-1362), ch. 374, p. 1789, § 4, effective June 6; (2.5) added, (HB 14-1162), ch. 167, p. 594, § 8, effective July 1; (3)(b)(XI) amended, (HB 14-1273), ch. 282, p. 1152, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 21-1031), ch. 116, p. 450, § 3, effective May 7.

Editor's note:

Section 8 of chapter 116 (HB 21-1031), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to any request to modify an order appealed on, after, or before May 7, 2021.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsections (1), (2), (3)(a), and (4), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1031, see section 1 of chapter 116, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

14-10-129.5. Disputes concerning parenting time.

Within thirty-five days after the filing of a verified motion by either parent or upon the court's own motion alleging that a parent is not complying with a parenting time order or schedule and setting forth the possible sanctions that may be imposed by the court, the court shall determine from the verified motion, and response to the motion, if any, whether there has been or is likely to be substantial or continuing noncompliance with the parenting time order or schedule and either:

Deny the motion, if there is an inadequate allegation; or

Set the matter for hearing with notice to the parents of the time and place of the hearing as expeditiously as possible; or

Require the parties to seek mediation and report back to the court on the results of the mediation within sixty-three days. Mediation services shall be provided in accordance with section 13-22-305, C.R.S. At the end of the mediation period, the court may approve an agreement reached by the parents or shall set the matter for hearing.

After the hearing, if a court finds that a parent has not complied with the parenting time order or schedule and has violated the court order, the court, in the best interests of the child, shall issue an order that may include but not be limited to one or more of the following orders:

An order imposing additional terms and conditions that are consistent with the court's previous order; except that the court shall separate the issues of child support and parenting time and shall not condition child support upon parenting time;

An order modifying the previous order to meet the best interests of the child;

An order requiring either parent or both parents to attend a parental education program as described in section

14-10-123.7

, at the expense of the noncomplying parent;

An order requiring the parties to participate in family counseling pursuant to section

13-22-313

, C.R.S., at the expense of the noncomplying parent;

An order requiring the violator to post bond or security to insure future compliance;

An order requiring that makeup parenting time be provided for the aggrieved parent or child under the following conditions:

That such parenting time is of the same type and duration of parenting time as that which was denied, including but not limited to parenting time during weekends, on holidays, and on weekdays and during the summer;

That such parenting time is made up within six months after the noncompliance occurs, unless the period of time or holiday can not be made up within six months in which case the parenting time shall be made up within one year after the noncompliance occurs;

That such parenting time takes place at the time and in the manner chosen by the aggrieved parent if it is in the best interests of the child;

An order finding the parent who did not comply with the parenting time schedule in contempt of court and imposing a fine or jail sentence;

An order imposing on the noncomplying parent a civil fine not to exceed one hundred dollars per incident of denied parenting time;

An order scheduling a hearing for modification of the existing order concerning custody or the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to a motion filed pursuant to section

14-10-131

;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 970, § 1, effective August 6, 1997.)

Any other order that may promote the best interests of the child or children involved.

Any civil fines collected as a result of an order entered pursuant to paragraph (e.5) of subsection (2) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the dispute resolution fund created in section 13-22-310, C.R.S.

In addition to any other order entered pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the court shall order a parent who has failed to provide court-ordered parenting time or to exercise court-ordered parenting time to pay to the aggrieved party, attorney's fees, court costs, and expenses that are associated with an action brought pursuant to this section. In the event the parent responding to an action brought pursuant to this section is found not to be in violation of the parenting time order or schedule, the court may order the petitioning parent to pay the court costs, attorney fees, and expenses incurred by such responding parent. Nothing in this section shall preclude a party's right to a separate and independent legal action in tort.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 578, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 579, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 970, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 98:

IP(2) and (2)(f) amended, p. 1388, § 16, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2012:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 833, § 34, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

14-10-130. Judicial supervision.

Except as otherwise agreed by the parties in writing at the time of the decree concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to a child, the person or persons with responsibility for decision-making may determine the child's upbringing, including his or her education, health care, and religious training, unless the court, after hearing and upon motion by the other party, finds that, in the absence of a specific limitation of the person's or persons' decision-making authority, the child's physical health would be endangered or the child's emotional development significantly impaired.

If both parties or all contestants agree to the order or if the court finds that in the absence of the order the child's physical health would be endangered or the child's emotional development significantly impaired, the court may order the county or district welfare department to exercise continuing supervision over the case to assure that the terms relating to the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to the child or parenting time terms of the decree are carried out.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 531, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-30.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 580, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1388, § 17, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2015:

(2) amended, (SB 15-099), ch. 99, p. 289, § 2, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

14-10-131. Modification of custody or decision-making responsibility.

If a motion for modification of a custody decree or a decree allocating decision-making responsibility has been filed, whether or not it was granted, no subsequent motion may be filed within two years after disposition of the prior motion unless the court decides, on the basis of affidavits, that there is reason to believe that a continuation of the prior decree of custody or order allocating decision-making responsibility may endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's emotional development.

The court shall not modify a custody decree or a decree allocating decision-making responsibility unless it finds, upon the basis of facts that have arisen since the prior decree or that were unknown to the court at the time of the prior decree, that a change has occurred in the circumstances of the child or the child's custodian or party to whom decision-making responsibility was allocated and that the modification is necessary to serve the best interests of the child. The trial court retains jurisdiction to modify an order allocating decision-making responsibility pursuant to this section during the pendency of an appeal. In applying these standards, the court shall retain the allocation of decision-making responsibility established by the prior decree unless:

The parties agree to the modification;

The child has been integrated into the family of the petitioner with the consent of the other party and such situation warrants a modification of the allocation of decision-making responsibilities;

There has been a modification in the parenting time order pursuant to section 14-10-129, that warrants a modification of the allocation of decision-making responsibilities;

A party has consistently consented to the other party making individual decisions for the child which decisions the party was to make individually or the parties were to make mutually; or

The retention of the allocation of decision-making responsibility would endanger the child's physical health or significantly impairs the child's emotional development and the harm likely to be caused by a change of environment is outweighed by the advantage of a change to the child.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 532, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-31.

L. 83:

(1) and IP(2) amended, p. 648, § 5, effective June 10.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1389, § 18, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2021:

IP(2) amended, (HB 21-1031), ch. 116, p. 450, § 4, effective May 7.

Editor's note:

Section 8 of chapter 116 (HB 21-1031), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to any request to modify an order appealed on, after, or before May 7, 2021.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Uniform Child-custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act", see article 13 of this title 14.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1031, see section 1 of chapter 116, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

14-10-131.3. Modification of the allocation of parental responsibilities and parenting time based upon military service - legislative declaration - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 331, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 624, § 1, effective May 10.

14-10-131.5. Joint custody modification - termination. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 646, § 2, effective June 10.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 1390, § 19, effective February 1, 1999.

14-10-131.7. Designation of custody for the purpose of other state and federal statutes.

For purposes of all other state and federal statutes that require a designation or determination of custody, the parenting plan set forth in the court's order shall identify the responsibilities of each of the parties.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1390, § 20, effective February 1, 1999.

14-10-131.8. Construction of 1999 revisions.

The enactment of the 1999 revisions to this article does not constitute substantially changed circumstances for the purposes of modifying decrees involving child custody, parenting time, or grandparent visitation. Any action to modify any decree involving child custody, parenting time, grandparent or great-grandparent visitation, or a parenting plan shall be governed by the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1390, § 20, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1362), ch. 374, p. 1789, § 5, effective June 6.

14-10-132. Affidavit practice.

A party seeking the modification of a custody decree or a decree concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities shall submit, together with his or her moving papers, an affidavit setting forth facts supporting the requested modification and shall give notice, together with a copy of his or her affidavit, to other parties to the proceeding, who may file opposing affidavits. The court shall deny the motion unless it finds that adequate cause for hearing the motion is established by the affidavits, in which case it shall set a date for hearing on an order to show cause why the requested modification should not be granted.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 532, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-32.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 479, § 2, effective March 16.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1390, § 21, effective February 1, 1999.

14-10-133. Effective date - applicability.

This article shall take effect January 1, 1972, and shall apply only to actions affected by this article which are commenced on or after such date; all such actions commenced prior to said date shall be governed by the laws then in effect.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 532, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-33.